Hawaii statutes.
[§235-17.5] Capital infrastructure tax
credit. (a) There shall be allowed to each taxpayer subject to the taxes
imposed by this chapter a capital infrastructure tax credit that shall be
deductible from the taxpayer's net income tax liability, if any, imposed by
this chapter for the taxable year in which the capital infrastructure costs
were paid or incurred.

(b) For the purpose of this section:

"Base investment" means the amount of
money invested by an investor.

"Capital infrastructure costs" means capital
expenditures, as used in section 263 of the Internal Revenue Code and the
regulations promulgated thereunder; provided that the capital expenditures are
for real property and fixtures that are paid or incurred in connection with the
displaced tenant's move of the tenant's current active trade or business to the
tenant's new location; provided further that the capital infrastructure costs
shall not include amounts for which another credit is claimed.

"Net income tax liability" means
income tax liability reduced by all other credits allowed under this chapter.

"Qualified infrastructure tenant"
means a business:

(1) That currently owns capital or property or
maintains an office, operations, or facilities at the former Kapalama military
reservation site;

(2) Whose principal business is maritime, and
waterfront dependent, and is included under the State's plan to relocate the
business to piers twenty-four through twenty-eight within Honolulu harbor; and

(3) Will be displaced and relocated by the State
pursuant to the Kapalama container terminal project.

(c) The amount of the tax credit shall be
equal to fifty per cent of the capital infrastructure costs paid or incurred by
the qualified infrastructure tenant during the taxable year up to a maximum of
$2,500,000 in capital infrastructure costs in any taxable year, provided that
the qualified infrastructure tenant shall notify the taxpayer claiming the
credit under subsection (a) of the amount of capital infrastructure costs which
may be claimed.

(d) In the case of an entity taxed as a
partnership, credit shall be determined at the entity level, but distribution
and share of the credit may be determined notwithstanding section 704 of the
Internal Revenue Code.

(e) The credit allowed under this section
shall be claimed against the net income tax liability for the taxable year. If
the tax credit under this section exceeds the taxpayer's income tax liability,
the excess of the tax credit over liability may be used as a credit against the
taxpayer's net income tax liability in subsequent years until exhausted. All
claims, including amended claims, for a tax credit under this section shall be
filed on or before the end of the twelfth month following the close of the
taxable year for which the credit may be claimed. Failure to comply with the
foregoing provision shall constitute a waiver of the right to claim the credit.

(f) This section shall not apply to taxable
years beginning after December 31, 2019.

(g) Any credit claimed under this section
shall be recaptured following the close of the taxable year for which the
credit is claimed if within three years:

(1) The qualified infrastructure tenant fails to
continue the line of business it conducted as of July 1, 2014; or

(2) The interest in the qualified infrastructure
tenant, whether in whole or in part, has been sold, exchanged, withdrawn, or
otherwise disposed of by the taxpayer claiming a credit under this section.

The recapture shall be equal to one hundred per cent
of the amount of the total tax credit claimed under this section in the
preceding five taxable years, and shall be added to the taxpayer's tax
liability for the taxable year in which the recapture occurs pursuant to this
subsection.

(h) The director of taxation shall prepare any
forms that may be necessary to claim a credit under this section. The director
may also require the taxpayer to furnish information to ascertain the validity
of the claim for credit made under this section. The director of taxation may
adopt rules to effectuate the purposes of this section pursuant to chapter 91.
[L 2014, c 200, §2]

Note

Section applies to taxable years beginning after December 31,
2013. L 2014, c 200, §6.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next